Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Domestic Violence and Abuse
403.7527.
Filing foreign protective order and affidavit — Certification by issuing court official — Entry into Law Information Network of Kentucky.

A copy of a foreign protective order may be filed in the office of the clerk of any court of competent jurisdiction of this state. A foreign protective order so filed shall have the same effect and shall be enforced in the same manner as an order of protection issued by a court of this state.

At the time of the filing of the foreign protective order, the person filing the order shall file with the clerk of the court an affidavit on a form prescribed and provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts. The affidavit shall set forth the name, city, county, and state or other jurisdiction of the issuing court. The person shall certify in the affidavit the validity and status of the foreign protective order, and attest to the person’s belief that the order has not been amended, rescinded, or superseded by any orders from a court of competent jurisdiction. All foreign protective orders presented with a completed and signed affidavit shall be accepted and filed.

The affidavit signed by the applicant shall have space where the reviewing judge shall place information necessary to allow the order’s entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky in the same manner as a Kentucky order.

If the person seeking to file the order presents a copy of the foreign order which is current by the terms of the order and has been certified by the clerk or other authorized officer of the court which issued it, the circuit clerk shall present it to the District Judge or Circuit Judge, who shall read the order and enter on the affidavit the information necessary to allow the order’s entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky. The order shall not be subject to further verification and shall be accepted as authentic, current, and subject to full faith and credit.

If the order presented is current by the terms of the order but is not certified in the manner specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the circuit clerk shall present the order and the affidavit to the District Judge or Circuit Judge, who shall read the order and enter on the affidavit the information necessary to allow the order’s entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky. The order shall be subject to full faith and credit in the same manner as a Kentucky order of protection, but shall be subject to verification by the circuit clerk. The order shall be valid for a period of fourteen (14) days and may be renewed once for a period of fourteen (14) days if the circuit clerk has not received a certified copy of the order from the issuing jurisdiction. The clerk shall treat the foreign protective order in the same manner as an order of protection issued pursuant to KRS

403.740

, except that no service on the adverse party shall be required pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

.

Upon the filing of an uncertified foreign protective order, the circuit clerk shall, within two (2) business days, contact the issuing court to request a certified copy of the order. If the certified copy of the order is received by the circuit clerk within the initial fourteen (14) day period, the clerk shall cause the information that certification has been received to be entered into the Law Information Network of Kentucky and shall notify the applicant for the order of the fact of its certification. A facsimile copy of a certified foreign protective order shall be grounds for the issuance of an order of protection.

If the clerk has not received a certified copy of the foreign protective order within ten (10) days, the clerk shall notify the court and the applicant that the order has not been received. The notice to the applicant, on a form prepared by the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall state that the foreign protective order will be extended for another fourteen (14) days, but will be dismissed at the expiration of that time. If the clerk informs the judge in writing that the certified foreign protective order has been requested but has not yet been received, the judge shall extend the foreign protective order for a period of fourteen (14) days. If certification of the foreign protective order is not received within twenty-eight (28) days, the foreign protective order shall expire and shall not be reissued. If the applicant meets the qualifications for the issuance of a Kentucky domestic violence order, the court may, upon proper application and showing of evidence, issue a Kentucky order in accordance with this chapter.

The right of a person filing a foreign protective order to bring an action to enforce the order instead of proceeding under this chapter remains unimpaired.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 606, § 189, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 102, § 12, effective January 1, 2016.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Amended Order of Protection and Affidavit for Certified Foreign Protective Order (AOC 275.10), Form 264.07.

403.7529.
Authentication of foreign protective order.

Upon ex parte review of the foreign protective order and the affidavit filed pursuant to KRS

403.7527

, and after determining the order is entitled to full faith and credit in this Commonwealth pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

, the court shall declare the order to be authenticated and record the finding on the affidavit.

If the court declares the order to be authenticated, the court shall:

Direct the appropriate law enforcement agency to assist the petitioner in having the provisions of the order complied with, if applicable; and

Order its enforcement in any county of the Commonwealth in the same manner as an domestic violence order of this state issued pursuant to KRS

403.740

.

The clerk shall notify the person who filed the foreign protective order of the decision of the court and provide the person a certified copy of the affidavit declaring the authentication of the order.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 606, § 190, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 102, § 13, effective January 1, 2016.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Amended Order of Protection and Affidavit for Certified Foreign Protective Order (AOC 275.10), Form 264.07.

403.7531.
Clearing of foreign protective orders from Law Information Network of Kentucky.

A foreign protective order which has been entered into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall be immediately cleared as an active record from the computer system when:

The order expires according to its terms;

A Kentucky court notifies the Law Information Network of Kentucky that a foreign protective order has been dismissed, either by court order or entry of notification by a circuit clerk; or

A circuit clerk notifies the Law Information Network of Kentucky that a foreign protective order tendered to the clerk has not been authenticated in the time period specified in KRS

403.7527

.

For validation purposes, the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall provide the circuit court clerk with a printout of foreign protective orders. The clerk shall validate each order annually by contacting the original issuing court or jurisdiction. If the clerk has not received information from the foreign jurisdiction within thirty-one (31) days, the clerk shall cause those orders to be cleared from the Law Information Network of Kentucky.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 102, § 14, effective January 1, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Note

(1/1/2016). In codification, the Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in subsection (1)(c) of this statute by changing a reference to the time period for authentication of foreign protective orders to read “time period specified in KRS

403.7527

,” the section which contains the deadlines for authentication of foreign protective orders. The error was corrected under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

403.7535.
Duty to notify court of change in foreign protective order.

A person who has filed a foreign protective order in a court in Kentucky is under a continuing obligation to inform the court of any expiration, vacation, modification, or other change in the order which the person filing the order has received from the issuing foreign court.

A person who has filed a foreign protective order in a court in Kentucky shall, within two (2) working days of the occurrence of any event specified in subsection (1) of this section, notify the clerk of the court in which the foreign protective order was filed of the fact of the changed order and present the clerk with a copy of the order for authentication as provided in this chapter. The clerk shall immediately notify the Law Information Network of Kentucky entering agency of the modification.

No court in Kentucky and no peace officer in Kentucky shall be expected to enforce a provision of a foreign protective order which has been the subject of any action specified in subsection (1) of this section, unless proper notice has been given in accordance with this section.

Intentional failure of a person who has filed a foreign protective order to make the notifications required by this section in the manner required by this section shall constitute contempt of court and may be grounds for an appropriate civil action brought by any person damaged by the intentional act of omission by the person failing to act.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 102, § 15, effective January 1, 2016.

403.7539.
Civil and criminal proceedings for violations of foreign protective orders. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 606, § 191, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.754.
Petitioner for protective order may apply for temporary permit to carry concealed deadly weapon — Criteria — Denial of application final — Conversion to concealed carry license — Automated listing of temporary permit holders.

A petitioner for an order of protection granted under KRS

403.715

to

403.785

may apply for a temporary permit to carry a concealed deadly weapon on or about his or her person into those places and under the same conditions as a person holding a carry concealed deadly weapon license issued under KRS

237.110

.

To request a temporary permit authorized by this section, the petitioner shall apply electronically for a license to carry a concealed deadly weapon in the manner set forth in KRS

237.110

and administrative regulation promulgated by the Department of Kentucky State Police, unless the electronic application is unavailable. If the electronic application is unavailable, applications for temporary permits under this section shall not be accepted.

Prior to the issuance of a temporary permit authorized by this section, the Department of Kentucky State Police, upon receipt of a completed application, application fee, and any documentation required by KRS

237.110

or administrative regulation promulgated by the Department of Kentucky State Police, shall conduct the background check as set forth in KRS

237.110

.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall issue a temporary permit authorized by this section if the applicant is not disqualified under the standards set forth in KRS 237.110(4)(a) to (h).

A temporary permit issued under this section shall be valid for forty-five (45) days from the date of issuance and not be subsequently extended or reissued. A temporary permit which has expired shall be void and shall not be valid for any purpose.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, within one (1) working day or as soon as practically possible after the date of receipt of the completed application, a recent color photograph of the applicant, and, for applicants who are not citizens of the United States, any documentation required under KRS

237.110

, either issue the temporary permit or deny the application based solely on the grounds that the applicant fails to qualify under the criteria set forth in KRS

237.110

.

In order to convert the temporary permit issued under this section into a license to carry a concealed deadly weapon issued under KRS

237.110

, the applicant shall meet the firearms safety training requirement under KRS

237.110

(4) within the forty-five (45) day period the temporary permit is valid. If firearms safety training is not completed within the forty-five (45) day temporary permit period, a new application for a license to carry a concealed deadly weapon shall be required.

If the Department of Kentucky State Police denies the application for a temporary permit, that decision shall be final but the applicant’s application for a license to carry a concealed deadly license shall continue to be processed and either issued or denied in accordance with KRS

237.110

.

The holder of a permit issued under this section shall carry the permit at all times the permit holder is carrying a concealed firearm or other deadly weapon and shall display the permit upon request of a law enforcement officer. Violation of the provisions of this subsection shall constitute a noncriminal violation with a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25), payable to the clerk of the District Court, but no court costs shall be assessed.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall maintain an automated listing of temporary permit holders and pertinent information under the same circumstances and restrictions set forth in KRS

237.110

.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the carrying of a concealed deadly weapon by a person prohibited from possessing such a weapon by state or federal law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 120, § 4, effective July 15, 2014.

403.755.
Enforcement by law enforcement agency. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.760.
Contempt of court. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.761.
Amendment of domestic violence order to require participation in global positioning monitoring system — Cost to be paid by respondent and system operator — Shortening or vacating of order — Penalty for violation.

Upon a petitioner’s request and after an evidentiary hearing, a court may amend a domestic violence order to require a respondent to participate in a global positioning monitoring system if:

The respondent has committed a substantial violation of a previously entered domestic violence order;

The court has reviewed an updated history of the respondent’s Kentucky criminal and protective order history; and

The court makes a factual determination that the use of a global positioning monitoring system would increase the petitioner’s safety.

An order requiring participation in a global positioning monitoring system shall:

Require the respondent to pay the cost of participation up to the respondent’s ability to pay, with the system operator bearing any uncovered costs for indigent respondents;

State with specificity the locations or areas where the respondent is prohibited from being located or persons with whom the respondent shall have no contact;

Include the date that the order expires, which shall be no longer than the expiration date of the domestic violence order, although participation may be extended if the underlying order is extended;

Require the entity that operates the monitoring system to immediately notify the petitioner, the local law enforcement agency named in the order, and the court if a respondent violates the order; and

Include any other information as the court deems appropriate.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a publicly available informational pamphlet containing information on the method of applying for, hearing, amending, and terminating an order requiring participation in a global positioning monitoring system.

The Supreme Court may establish by rule a sliding scale of payment responsibility for indigent defendants for use in establishing required payments under subsection (2) of this section.

A person, county, or other organization may voluntarily agree to pay all or a portion of a respondent’s monitoring costs specified in this section.

An order requiring participation in a global positioning monitoring system may be shortened or vacated by the court either:

Upon request of the petitioner; or

Upon request of the respondent after an evidentiary hearing, if the respondent has not violated the order and:

Three (3) months have elapsed since the entry of the order; and

No previous request has been made by the respondent in the previous six (6) months.

A respondent who fails to wear, removes, tampers with, or destroys a global positioning monitoring system device in contravention of an order entered under this section shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 170, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 141, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 102, § 16, effective January 1, 2016.

403.762.
Request for modification of global positioning monitoring order — Hearing. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 170, § 8, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.763.
Violation order of protection constitutes contempt of court and criminal offense.

Violation of the terms or conditions of an order of protection after the person has been served or given notice of the order shall constitute contempt of court and a criminal offense under this section. Once a criminal or contempt proceeding has been initiated, the other shall not be undertaken regardless of the outcome of the original proceeding.

Court proceedings for contempt of court for violation of an order of protection shall be held in the county where the order was issued or filed.

Court proceedings for a criminal violation of an order of protection shall follow the rules of venue applicable to criminal cases generally.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth from prosecuting and convicting the respondent of criminal offenses other than violation of an order of protection.

A person is guilty of a violation of an order of protection when he or she intentionally violates the provisions of an order of protection after the person has been served or given notice of the order.

Violation of an order of protection is a Class A misdemeanor.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 172, § 15, effective July 14, 1992; 2015 ch. 102, § 17, effective January 1, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2016). In 2015 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 17, this statute was repealed and reenacted with language substantially different from that contained in the version current at that time. In Section 51 of that Act, KRS

403.763

(this statute) was also included in the list of statutes to be repealed. In codification, the Reviser of Statutes has determined that there was no intention to both repeal and repeal and reenact the same statute and that the inclusion of KRS

403.763

in the list of
statutes to be repealed was a manifest clerical or typographical error. As such, that repeal will not prevail over its repeal and reenactment in the same Act under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h).

403.765.
Certification of existence of domestic violence protective orders — Efficacy of existing orders. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 258, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 172, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 99, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.770.
Nonpublication of petitioner’s and minor children’s addresses — Forwarding of orders to Law Information Network of Kentucky and other agencies. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 99, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.771.
Printout of foreign orders — Annual validation. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 17, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.775.
Effect of petitioner’s leaving residence. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.780.
Testimony not admissible in criminal proceeding. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.783.
Model law enforcement domestic violence policy and procedures manual — Distribution — Agency submission to Justice Cabinet — Assistance by cabinet when policy inadequate. [Repealed.]

403.784.
Training and continuing education courses for law enforcement officers. [Repealed.]

403.785.
Duties of law enforcement officers and agencies.

A court issuing an order of protection shall direct the appropriate law enforcement agency to assist the petitioner in having the provisions of the order complied with.

When a law enforcement officer has reason to suspect that a person has been the victim of domestic violence and abuse, the officer shall use all reasonable means to provide assistance to the victim, including but not limited to:

Remaining at the location of the call for assistance so long as the officer reasonably suspects there is danger to the physical safety of individuals there without the presence of a law enforcement officer;

Assisting the victim in obtaining medical treatment, including transporting the victim to the nearest medical facility capable of providing the necessary treatment;

Advising the victim immediately of the rights available to them as provided in KRS

421.500

, including the provisions of this chapter; and

Completing a JC-3 form, or its equivalent replacement, and providing the information to the Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center pursuant to KRS

209A.110

.

Orders of protection shall be enforced in any county of the Commonwealth.

Officers acting in good faith under this section shall be immune from criminal and civil liability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 13, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 54, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 583, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 53, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 629, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 102, § 18, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 191, § 15, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 224, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.